North Carolina statutes. Chapter 135. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees; Social Security; State Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees.
Article 1. Retirement System for Teachers and State Employees.
30, 1994, shall be increased by a prorated amount of three and one-half percent (3.5%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between
July 1, 1993, and June 30, 1994.

(zz)
From and after July 1, 1995, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1994, shall be increased by two percent (2%) of the allowance payable on July
1, 1994, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1995, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1994, but before June 30, 1995, shall
be increased by a prorated amount of two percent (2%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1994, and June 30, 1995.

(aaa)

Increase in Allowance as to Persons on Retirement Rolls as of June 1, 1995. —
From and after July 1, 1995, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries on the retirement rolls as of June 1, 1995, shall be increased by one and two-tenths of one percent (1.2%) of the allowance
payable on June 1, 1995. This allowance shall be calculated on the allowance payable and in effect on June 30, 1995, so as not to be compounded on any other increase granted by act of the 1995 General Assembly.

(bbb)
From and after September 1, 1996, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1995, shall be increased by four and four-tenths percent (4.4%) of the
allowance payable on July 1, 1995, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after September 1, 1996, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1995, but
before June 30, 1996, shall be increased by a prorated amount of four and four-tenths percent (4.4%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance
was paid between July 1, 1995, and June 30, 1996.

(ccc)
From and after July 1, 1997, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1996, shall be increased by four percent (4%) of the allowance payable on
June 1, 1997, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1997, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1996, but before June 30, 1997, shall
be increased by a prorated amount of four percent (4%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 1996, and June 30,
1997.

(ddd)

Increase in Allowance as to Persons on Retirement Rolls as of June 1, 1997. —
From and after July 1, 1997, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries on the retirement rolls as of June 1, 1997, shall be increased by two and two-tenths percent (2.2%) of the allowance payable
on June 1, 1997. This allowance shall be calculated on the allowance payable and in effect on June 30, 1997, so as not to be compounded on any other increase granted by act of the 1997 General Assembly.

(eee)
From and after July 1, 1998, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1997, shall be increased by two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the allowance
payable on June 1, 1998, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1998, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1997, but before June
30, 1998, shall be increased by a prorated amount of two and one-half percent (2.5%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between
July 1, 1997, and June 30, 1998.

(fff)
From and after July 1, 1999, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1998, shall be increased by two and three-tenths percent (2.3%) of the allowance
payable on June 1, 1999, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 1999, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1998, but before June
30, 1999, shall be increased by a prorated amount of two and three-tenths percent (2.3%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between
July 1, 1998, and June 30, 1999.

(ggg)

Increase in Allowance as to Persons on Retirement Rolls as of June 1, 2000. —
From and after July 1, 2000, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries on the retirement rolls as of June 1, 2000, shall be increased by six-tenths percent (0.6%) of the allowance payable on June
1, 2000. This allowance shall be calculated on the allowance payable and in effect on June 30, 2000, so as not to be compounded on any other increase granted by act of the 1999 General Assembly, 2000 Regular Session.

(hhh)
From and after July 1, 2000, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 1999, shall be increased by three and six-tenths percent (3.6%) of the allowance
payable on June 1, 2000, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2000, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 1999, but before June
30, 2000, shall be increased by a prorated amount of three and six-tenths percent (3.6%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between
July 1, 1999, and June 30, 2000.

(iii)
From and after July 1, 2001, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2000, shall be increased by two percent (2%) of the allowance payable on June
1, 2001, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2001, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2000, but before June 30, 2001, shall
be increased by a prorated amount of two percent (2%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2000, and June 30, 2001.

(jjj)
From and after July 1, 2002, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2001, shall be increased by one and four-tenths percent (1.4%) of the allowance
payable on June 1, 2002, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2002, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2001, but before June
30, 2002, shall be increased by a prorated amount of one and four-tenths percent (1.4%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between
July 1, 2001, and June 30, 2002.

(kkk)

Increase in Allowance as to Persons on Retirement Rolls as of June 1, 2002. —
From and after July 1, 2002, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries on the retirement rolls as of June 1, 2002, shall be increased by six-tenths of one percent (0.6%) of the allowance payable
on June 1, 2002. This allowance shall be calculated on the allowance payable and in effect on June 30, 2002, so as not to be compounded on any other increase granted by act of the 2002 Regular Session of the 2001 General Assembly.

(
lll
)
From and after July 1, 2003, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2002, shall be increased by one and twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%)
of the allowance payable on June 1, 2003, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2003, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2002,
but before June 30, 2003, shall be increased by a prorated amount of one and twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement
allowance was paid between July 1, 2002, and June 30, 2003.

(mmm)
From and after July 1, 2004, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2003, shall be increased by one and seven-tenths percent (1.7%) of the allowance
payable on June 1, 2004, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2004, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2003, but before June
30, 2004, shall be increased by a prorated amount of one and seven-tenths percent (1.7%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between
July 1, 2003, and June 30, 2004.

(nnn)
From and after July 1, 2005, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2004, shall be increased by two percent (2%) of the allowance payable on June
1, 2005, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2005, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2004, but before June 30, 2005, shall
be increased by a prorated amount of two percent (2%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2004, and June 30, 2005.

(ooo)
From and after July 1, 2006, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2005, shall be increased by three percent (3%) of the allowance payable on
June 1, 2006, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2006, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2005, but before June 30, 2006, shall
be increased by a prorated amount of three percent (3%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2005, and June 30,
2006.

(ppp)
Repealed by Session Laws 2007-431, s. 7, effective July 1, 2007.

(qqq)
From and after July 1, 2007, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2006, shall be increased by two and two-tenths percent (2.2%) of the allowance
payable on June 1, 2007, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2007, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2006, but before June
30, 2007, shall be increased by a prorated amount of two and two-tenths percent (2.2%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between
July 1, 2006, and June 30, 2007.

(rrr)
From and after July 1, 2008, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2007, shall be increased by two and two-tenths percent (2.2%) of the allowance
payable on June 1, 2008, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2008, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2007, but before June
30, 2008, shall be increased by a prorated amount of two and two-tenths percent (2.2%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between
July 1, 2007, and June 30, 2008.

(sss)
From and after July 1, 2012, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2011, shall be increased by one percent (1%) of the allowance payable on June
1, 2012, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2012, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2011, but before June 30, 2012, shall
be increased by a prorated amount of one percent (1%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2011, and June 30, 2012.

(ttt)
From and after July 1, 2014, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2013, shall be increased by one percent (1%) of the allowance payable on June
1, 2014, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2014, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2013, but before June 30, 2014, shall
be increased by a prorated amount of one percent (1%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2013, and June 30, 2014.

(uuu)
On or before October 31, 2016, a one-time cost-of-living supplement payment shall be made to or on account of beneficiaries who are living as of September 1, 2016, and whose retirement commenced on or before September
1, 2016. The payment shall be one and six-tenths percent (1.6%) of the beneficiary’s annual retirement allowance payable as of September 1, 2016, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the beneficiary
dies before the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member’s legal representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a vested right to any future supplemental payments.

(vvv)
From and after July 1, 2017, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced on or before July 1, 2016, shall be increased by one percent (1%) of the allowance payable on June
1, 2017, in accordance with G.S. 135-5(o). Furthermore, from and after July 1, 2017, the retirement allowance to or on account of beneficiaries whose retirement commenced after July 1, 2016, but before June 30, 2017, shall
be increased by a prorated amount of one percent (1%) of the allowance payable as determined by the Board of Trustees based upon the number of months that a retirement allowance was paid between July 1, 2016, and June 30, 2017.

(www)
On or before October 31, 2018, a one-time cost-of-living supplement payment shall be made to or on account of beneficiaries who are living as of September 1, 2018, and whose retirement commenced on or before September
1, 2018. The payment shall be one percent (1%) of the beneficiary’s annual retirement allowance payable as of September 1, 2018, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the beneficiary dies before
the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member’s legal representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a vested right to any future supplemental payments.

(xxx)
On or before December 31, 2021, a one-time cost-of-living supplement payment shall be made to or on account of beneficiaries who are living as of September 1, 2021, and whose retirement commenced on or before September
1, 2021. The payment shall be two percent (2%) of the beneficiary’s annual retirement allowance payable as of September 1, 2021, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement. If the beneficiary dies before
the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member’s legal representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a vested right to any future supplemental payments.

(yyy)
After September 1, 2022, but on or before October 31, 2022, a one-time cost-of-living supplement payment shall be made to or on account of beneficiaries who are living as of September 1, 2022, and whose retirement
commenced on or before September 1, 2022. The payment shall be three percent (3%) of the beneficiary’s annual retirement allowance payable as of September 1, 2022, and shall not be prorated for date of retirement commencement.
If the beneficiary dies before the payment is made, then the payment shall be payable to the member’s legal representative. No beneficiary shall be deemed to have acquired a vested right to any future supplemental payments.

Period in Which Benefits Commenced Percentage January 1, 1966, to June 30, 1967 5% Year 1965 6% Year 1964 7% Year 1963 8% and so on concluding with Year 1942 29%

Increase Increase In In Index Allowance 1.00 to 1.49% 1% 1.50 to 2.49% 2% 2.50 to 3.49% 3% 3.50% or more 4%

Year(s) in Which Benefits Commenced Percentage 1969 1 1968 4 1967 6 1965 through 1966 9 1964 12 1963 14 1959 through 1962 17 1942 through 1958 22

Period in Which Benefits Commenced Percentage On or before June 30, 1963 10% July 1, 1963, to June 30, 1968 7% July 1, 1968, to June 30, 1977 2%

History.
1941, c. 25, s. 5; 1945, c. 218; 1947, c. 458, ss. 3, 4, 7, 8a; 1949, c. 1056, ss. 3, 5; 1955, c. 1155, ss. 1, 2; 1957, c. 855, ss. 5-8; 1959, c. 490; c. 513, ss. 2, 3; c. 620, ss. 1-3; c. 624; 1961, c. 516, s. 4; c. 779,
s. 1; 1963, c. 687, s. 3; 1965, c. 780, s. 1; 1967, c. 720, ss. 4-10; c. 1223; 1969, c. 1223, ss. 2, 5-12; 1971, c. 117, ss. 11-15; c. 118, ss. 3-7; 1973, c. 241, ss. 3-7; c. 242, ss. 2-4; c. 737, s. 2; c. 816, s. 2; c. 994, ss. 1,
3; c. 1312, ss. 1-3; 1975, c. 457, ss. 2-4; c. 511, ss. 1, 2; c. 634, ss. 1, 2; c. 875, s. 47; 1977, c. 561; c. 802, ss. 50.65-50.70; 1979, c. 838, s. 99; c. 862, ss. 1, 4, 5; c. 972, s. 4; c. 975, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1137, ss.
63, 64, 66; c. 1196, s. 1; c. 1216; 1981, c. 672, s. 1; c. 689, s. 2; c. 859, ss. 42, 42.1, 44; c. 940, s. 1; c. 975, s. 3; c. 978, ss. 1, 2; c. 980, ss. 3, 4; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1282, s. 11; 1983, c. 467; c. 761, ss. 218,
219, 228, 229; c. 902, s. 1; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1019, s. 1; c. 1034, ss. 222, 232-235, 237; c. 1049, ss. 1-3; 1985, c. 348, s. 2; c. 479, ss. 189(a), 190, 191, 192(a), 194; c. 520, s. 2; c. 649, ss. 8, 10; 1985 (Reg. Sess.,
1986), c. 1014, s. 49(a); 1987, c. 181, s. 1; c. 513, s. 1; c. 738, ss. 27(a), 29(c)-(j), 37(a); c. 824, s. 3; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1061, s. 1; c. 1086, s. 22(a); c. 1108, s. 1; c. 1110, ss. 1-3; 1989, c. 717, ss. 1-6; c. 731,
s. 1; c. 752, s. 41(a); c. 770, s. 31; c. 792, ss. 3.1-3.3; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 1077, ss. 2-5; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 766, s. 2; c. 900, ss. 52(a)-(c), 53(b); 1993, c. 321, ss. 74(c)-(e), 74.1(e), (f), 74.2(a); c. 531,
s. 5; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 769, ss. 7.30(g)-(j), (m), (r); 1995, c. 507, ss. 7.22(a), 7.23(a), (b), 7.23A(a), (b); c. 509, ss. 74, 75; 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 28.21(a); 1997-443, s. 33.22(a)-(d); 1998-153, s. 21(a); 1998-212,
ss. 28.26(c), 28.27(a); 1999-237, s. 28.23(a); 2000-67, ss. 26.20(a)-(d); 2001-424, s. 32.22(a); 2002-126, ss. 28.8(a), 28.9(a)-(d); 2003-284, s. 30.17(a); 2003-359, ss. 3-6, 11; 2004-124, s. 31.17(a); 2004-147, s. 1; 2005-91, ss.
2, 3; 2005-276, s. 29.25(a); 2006-66, s. 22.18(a); 2006-172, s. 1; 2007-323, s. 28.20(a); 2007-384, ss. 10.3, 10.4; 2007-431, ss. 1, 5, 7, 12, 13.; 2007-496, s. 1; 2008-107, s. 26.23(a); 2009-66, ss. 3(a)-(d), 5(a)-(c), 6(a), 9, 11(e)-(g),
12(c), (d); 2009-109, s. 1; 2010-72, ss. 1(a), 2(a), 3(b), 9(a), 10(a); 2010-96, s. 40.7; 2010-124, ss. 1, 2, 3, 6.1; 2011-232, ss. 2-7; 2011-294, s. 3(a); 2012-142, s. 25.13(a); 2013-405, s. 1; 2014-88, ss. 1(a), 2(a); 3(b)-(g); 2014-97,
ss. 2, 3(a), 4(f); 2014-100, s. 35.14(a); 2014-112, ss. 1(a), 3(a); 2015-164, s. 10(a); 2016-56, ss. 4(a), 5(a); 2016-94, s. 36.21(a); 2017-57, s. 35.19A(a); 2017-129, ss. 1(b), 2(t), 3(a)-(b); 2018-5, s. 35.28(a); 2018-22, ss. 2(a),
3(a)-(d); 2018-85, ss. 3(a), 11(a); 2018-145, s. 9(a), (b); 2020-48, s. 1.2(a); 2021-72, ss. 2.1(b), 3.1(e); 2021-75, s. 7.1(b); 2021-180, s. 39.23(a).

Subsection (a3) Set Out Twice.

The first version of subsection (a3) set out above is effective until July 1, 2022. The second version of subsection (a3) set out above is effective July 1, 2022.

Cross References.

As to repayment of contributions withdrawn pursuant to subsection (f) of this section, see

G.S. 135-4

, subsection (k).